Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1999.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1352.3. Smokey Bear license plate.(a) Design.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, shall design a special Smokey Bear registration plate that:(1) features a depiction of Smokey Bear based on iconography used by the Forest Service within the United States Department of Agriculture relating to Smokey Bear; and(2) includes the phrase "Only you can prevent wildfires."(b) Application.--Upon application by any person and payment 1234567891011121314151617 of a $43 fee, which shall be in addition to the registration fee, the department shall issue a Smokey Bear registration plate to the person.(c) Limitation on gross weight.--The special registration plate may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.(d) Fee allocation.--(1) The amount of $14 of each fee collected under subsection (b) shall be deposited into the Wild Resource Conservation Fund established under 27 Pa.C.S. § 6108 (relating to Wild Resource Conservation Fund and duties of Department of Conservation and Natural Resources).(2) The money deposited under paragraph (1) shall be used by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for wildfire mitigation.(e) Federal authorization.--(1) The department shall request, in accordance with Federal law, authorization from the Chief of the Forest Service within the United States Department of Agriculture, or a designee of the chief, for the rights to use the depiction of Smokey Bear for registration plates in accordance with this section.(2) The duties of the department under this section are contingent upon the department obtaining the authorization under paragraph (1).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1999PN2538 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526